src/fst/phonology-morph-bound.twolc
! Copyright © 2015–2019 Alberta Language Technology Lab (ALTLab)
! http://altlab.artsrn.ualberta.ca/
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
! but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
! MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
! GNU Affero General Public License for more details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
! along with this program. If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

! Code for compiling TWOLC with HFST
! hfst-twolc -R inc/crk-phon.twolc -o inc/crk-phon.hfst
! -R handle forces resolution of conflicts
!
! Code for pair-testing compiled (H)FST with pair-tests
! hfst-pair-test -X -i inc/crk-phon.hfst -I inc/crk-phon.twolc

! Rewrite rule templates from TWOLC session December 2017.
! Probably entirely defunct, but here for reference.
!
! Cw$i -> C$o
! V[wy]$i -> VV
!
! [aâ][wy]$i -> â$
! ê[wy]$i -> ê$
! [iî][wy]$i -> î$
! [oô][wy]$i -> ô$
!
! V -> 0 || _ $V (after stem) ! Weird?
!! | --- 


! ========================================================================
! 
! Current FST      ——> New Arok’s Class                      Special Chrs.
! ========================================================================
! 
! VII-w impersonal ——> VII-1_SG                                    
! VII-w regular    ——> VII-1_SGPL                                 
! 
! VII-n impersonal ——> VII-2_SG                                   [n3]
! VII-n regular    ——> VII-2_SGPL                                 [n3??]
! 
! 
! 
! VAI-v            ——> VAI-1                                         [n2]
! VAI-n            ——> VAI-2                                         [n2]
! VAI-am           ——> VAI-3 (VTI like)                              [n2]
! 
! VTI-am           ——> VTI-1                                         [n2]
! VTI-â            ——> VTI-2[n2]
! VTI-ø            ——> VTI-3 (Dims/Habs) (VAIlike)                   [n2]
!     
! VTA              ——> VTA-1 (Regulars)                              [ii2]
! VTA-Vw           ——> VTA-2                                         [i2][ii2]
! VTA-Cw           ——> VTA-3 (hw, sw stem endings mostly)            [i2][ii2]
! VTA-Ts           ——> VTA-4 (kostew will go here)                   [t3][i3][ii2]
! VTAi             ——> VTA-5 (ahew, itew, ay-itew)                   [i3]
! 
! 
! ! ##locative, dim, poss -im VGi > V: - i from *e, i2 (CHANGE OTHER i2)
! ! ##-i2hk, -i2nâhk, -i2s(is), -i2m
! ! ##also for possessive suffixes -i2nân, -i2naw/-i2nânaw, -i2wâw, -i2yiw(a)
! 
! NI-1	Regular
! NI-2	Vowel-glides
! NI-3	Cw (hidden -w-), indicated by stem-final -w
! NI-4	single-syllable stems with vowel-finals
! NI-4w	single-syllable stems with hidden final -w
! NI-5	derivations of -was 'bag' -> PL: -wata -> NI-5, with special -t- for -wat: -s- shows only in singular, -t- stays when inflected (and turns into -c- when diminutivized)
! 	
! NA-1	Regular, all diminutives
! NA-2	Vowel-glides
! NA-3	Cw (Hidden -w-): indicated by stem-final -w
! NA-4	single-syllable stems, always end -a in SG, even when compounded, iskwêw(i)-âya ('female being')
! 	
! Dependent stems; ones that require -im	

! ========================================================================



Alphabet

 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 
 â ê î ô ý
 Â Ê Î Ô
 %-

 i:0   i:î
 i2:i ! i2:0
 ii2:î ii2:0
 t:t   t:c
 t2:t  t2:0  t2:c
 t3:t  ! t3:s
 w:w  ! w:o
 w2:w
 n2:n
 n3:n n3:h
 t:c t2:c
 t4:t ! t4:c when before ikâtê- in VTI

 ý:y

 y2:0      !!= * @CODE@ epenthetic joiner in reduplication of vowel-initial stems
 y3:0      !!= * @CODE@ epenthetic joiner in reduplication of vowel-initial stems
 d1:0  !!= * @CODE@ Reduplication consonant place holder 
 d2:0  !!= * @CODE@ Reduplication consonant place holder 

 %^EGLOT:0   !!= * @CODE@ Epenthetic -h- place holder

 a:â â:â
 w:0 y:0 ý:0

 w3:w !!= * @CODE@ 3rd person possessor for NDA and NDI (non-kinship)
 y4:y !!= * @CODE@ immutable -y in single-syllable nouns
 i4:i !!= * @CODE@ possessive prefix -i that deletes before Vowel in Dep nouns

 %>
 %<
 
 %^DIM:0
 %^IC:0
 %^COM:0
 ;
 
Sets

  Bx = %> %< ;
  
  Ix = i i2 ii2 ;
  
  Vowel = a â ê i î o ô ;

  Consonant = c h k m n p s t w y ý ;
  
  Gx = w y ý ;
  ! Tx = t t2 ;
  
Rules

! ##locative, dim, poss -im VGi > V: - i from *e, i2 (CHANGE OTHER i2)
! ##-i2hk, -i2nâhk, -i2s(is), -i2m
! ##also for possessive suffixes -i2nân, -i2naw/-i2nânaw, -i2wâw, -i2yiw(a)
! ##also for VTAs, done below
! 
! #aGiRule [ [ a | â ] [ w | y | ý ] %/ i -> â ]
! #{a,â} {w,y} i2 > â

"VGiRule1"
Vx:Vy <=> \.#. \.#. \Bx: 0:* _ [ %^COM:0 | Gx: ] Bx: i2: ; ! Two word-initial characters required before morpheme-boundary to avoid conflict with IC rule
   where Vx in ( a i o )
         Vy in ( â î ô )
   matched ;

"VGiRule2"
Cx:0 <=> Vowel: _ Bx: i2: ;
    where Cx in Gx ;

"VGiRule3"
i2:0 <=> Vowel: [ %^COM:0 | Gx: ] Bx: _ ;

!!€ mêskanaw>i2s
!!€ mêskanâ0>0s 

! #mêskanâs - NI Dim 
! m ê s k a n a:â w:0 %>: i2:0 s
! 
! #mêskanâhk - NI Loc
! m ê s k a n a:â w:0 %>: i2:0 h k 

!!€ mêskanaw>i2hk
!!€ mêskanâ0>0hk

! #sôniyâs - NA dim
! s ô n i y â:â w:0 %>: i2:0 s

!!€ sôniyâw>i2s^DIM
!!€ sôniyâ0>0s0

! #miskocâkâs NDI dim
! m i s k o t:c â k a:â y:0 %>: i2:0 s

!!€ miskotâkay>i2s^DIM
!!€ miskocâkâ0>0s0

! #eGiRule [ ê [ w | y | ý ] %/ i -> ê ]
! #{ê} {w,y} i2 > ê
! 
! #nâpêsis - NA dim
! n â p ê:ê w:0 %>: i2:0 s i s 

!!€ nâpêw>i2^DIMsis
!!€ nâpê0>00sis

! #iskwênâhk - NA loc
! i s k w ê:ê w:0 %>: i2:0 n â h k 

!!€ iskwêw>i2^DIMsis
!!€ iskwê0>00sis

! 
! #iGiRule [ [ i | î ] [ w | y | ý ] %/ [ i | î ] -> î ]
! #{i,î} {w,y} i2 > î
! 
! #maskosîs - NI dim
! m a s k o s i:î y:0 %>: i2:0 s 

!!€ maskosiy>i2^DIMs
!!€ maskosî0>00s

! #pikîs - NA dim
! p i k i:î w:0 %>: i2:0 s

!!€ pikiw>i2^DIMs
!!€ pikî0>00s

! #maskosîhk - NI loc
! m a s k o s i:î y:0 %>: i2:0 h k 

!!€ maskosiy>i2hk
!!€ maskosî0>0hk

! #oGiRule [ [ o | ô ] [ w | y | ý ] %/ i -> ô ]
! #{o,ô} {w,y} i2 > ô 

! #sîwâpôs - NI dim
! s î w â p o:ô y:0 %>: i2:0 s

!!€ sîwâpoy>i2^DIMs
!!€ sîwâpô0>00s

! #tohtôsâpôhk
! t o h t ô s â p o:ô y:0 %>: i2:0 h k 

!!€ tohtôsâpoy>i2hk
!!€ tohtôsâpô0>0hk

! #iiRule i-i2 > i

"iiRule"
i2:0 <=> i: Bx: _  ;

! #wâwis
! w â w i:i %>: i2:0 s 

!!€ wâwi>i2^DIMs
!!€ wâwi>00s

! #ôsihk
! ô s i:i %>: i2:0 h k 

!!€ ôsi>i2hk
!!€ ôsi>0hk
! 
! #Cwi > Co (i and i2)

"Cwi2CoôRule1"
w:Ox <=> Consonant: _ Bx: Vx: ;
     where Vx in ( i i2 ii2 )
           Ox in ( o  o   ô )
     matched ;
     
! "Cwî2CoRule1a"
! w:o <=> Consonant: _ Bx: [ i: | i2: ] ;

! "Cwî2CôRule1b"
! w:ô <=> Consonant: _ Bx: ii2: ;

"Cwi2CoôRule2"
Ix:0 <=> Consonant: w: Bx: _ ;

! "Cwi2CoRule1b"
! i2:0 <=> Consonant: w: Bx: _ ;

! "Cwî2CôRule2"
! î2:0 <=> Consonant: w: Bx: _ ;

! #acimos
!!€ atimw>i2^DIMs
!!€ acimo>00s

! #mistikohk
! m i s t i k w:o %>: i2:0 h k

!!€ mistikw>i2hk
!!€ mistiko>0hk
! 
! #no change after plain consonants, i2:i
! 
!!€ sâkahikan>i2^DIMs
!!€ sâkahikan>i0s

! #maskasinihk
! m a s k i s i n %>: i2:i h k 

!!€ maskisin>i2hk
!!€ maskisin>ihk
! 
! ## Cw# > C

"wFinalRule"
w:0 <=> Consonant: _ .#. ;

!!€ atimw
!!€ atim0

! #askihk
! a s k i h k w:0

!!€ askihkw
!!€ askihk0

! #atim
! a t i m w:0

!!€ atimw
!!€ atim0

!!€ nit2<nînihikw
!!€ ni0<nînihik

! ##diminutive sound symbolism palatalisation (requires DIM trigger?)
! #{t,t2} > c / _...DIM

"etanRule"
a:ê <=> _ %>: t: â: n: .#. ;

!!€ a>tân
!!€ ê>tân

"DimRule"
t:c <=> _ :* %^DIM:0 ;

! #nicascocinis
! n i t2:c %<: a s t:c o t:c i n %>: i2:i s

!!€ nit2<astotin>i2^DIMs
!!€ nic<ascocin>i0s

!!!!!! 
! ! 
! ! ##connecting t - independent verbs, possessed nouns
! ! ##t2 > t / _V

"t-epenthesisRule"
t2:0 <=> _ %<: :Consonant ;

"t-epenthesisDimRule"
t2:c <=> _ %<: :Vowel :* %^DIM:0 ;

! ! #nitapin - VAI 1Sg
! n i t2:t %<: a p i %>: n 
! 
! !!€ nit2<api>n
! !!€ nit<api>n
! 
! #kitapinaw - VAI 12Pl
! k i t2:t %<: a p i %>: n a w 
! 
! !!€ kit2<api>n 
! !!€ kit<api>n
! 
! #otastotin - NI Px3Sg 
! o t2:t %<: a s t o t i n
! 
! !!€ ot2<astotin
! !!€ ot<astotin
! 
! ! 
! ! ##o>w for certain possessed nouns (but these are dependent, why not handled with kinship?)
! ! ##previously seen before î, a, â?, and iy (phonetically îy)
! ! ##new tag w2 (can become w2 after other changes, discussed for VTA-2)
! ! 
! ! #wiyâw
! o:w %<: i y â w2:w
! 
! !!€ o>iyâw2
! !!€ w>iyâw
! 
! #wîpit
! o:w %<: î p i t 
! 
! !!€ o>îpit
! !!€ w>îpit
! 
! #wahkwan
! o:w %<: a h k w a n
! 
! !!€ o>ahkwan
! !!€ w>ahkwan 
! ! 
! ! 
! ! ##ê > â _-n - independent 1/2 VAI-v, VTI-v

"h-epenthesisRule"
%^EGLOT:h <=> :Vowel ( %^IC:0 ) _ %<: [ d1:0 | d2:0 | :Vowel ] ;

!!€ ê^EGLOT<acimo>t
!!€ êh<acimo>t

!!€ ê^EGLOT<d1ay2<acimo>t
!!€ êh<0ay<acimo>t

!!€ ê^EGLOT<d2ay3d1âh<acimo>t
!!€ êh<0ay0âh<acimo>t

"ee2aaVAIRule"
ê:â <=> _ %>: n2: ;

! #ninêhiyawân - VAI 1Sg
! n i t2:0 %<: n ê h i y a w ê:â %>: n
! 
!!€ nit2<nêhiyawê>n2 
!!€ ni0<nêhiyawâ>n
!  
! #kikâsîhkwân
! k i t2:0 %<: k â s î h k w ê:â %>: n
! 
!!€ kit2<kâsîhkwê>n2
!!€ ki0<kâsîhkwâ>n
! 
! 
! ##a > ê / _-n - independent 1/2 VTI-t
! -an > -ên

"a2eeVTIRule"
a:ê <=> \.#. \.#. \.#. _ %>: n2: ; ! Initial non-word-boundaries added to resolve conflict with IC rule, but might be superceded by a change to the affixal morphotax ; a>ê-n --> -ên

! #nitipiskên
! n i t2:0 %<: t i p i s k a:ê %>: n
! 
!!€ nit2<tipiska>n2 
!!€ ni0<tipiskê>n
! 
! #kikiskêyihtên
! k i t2:0 %<: k i s k ê y i h t a:ê %>: n
! 
!!€ kit2<kiskêyihta>n2 
!!€ ki0<kiskêyihtê>n
! 
! ! 
! ! 
! ! ##n-final VIIs that take -hk NEW SPECIAL CHARACTER (adapt for VAI-n?? e.g. n2 > 0 / _-hk)
! ! ## n > h / _-k

"n2hxRule"
n3:h <=> _ %>: k: ;

! ! #ê-nîpihk
! ê - %<: n î p i n3:h %>: k

!!€ ê-<nîpin3>k 
!!€ ê-<nîpih>k

"n20VIIRule"
n:0 <=> _ %>: k: ;

! #ê-mispok
! ê - %<: m i s p o n:0 %>: k

!!€ ê-<mispon>k 
!!€ ê-<mispo0>k
! 

! Changes t4 to c when ikâtê follows in VTI
"t2cVTIRule"
t4:c <=> _ %>: i: k: â: t: ê: ;

! #wapâhcikâtêw - V+TI+Der/X+V+II+3Sg
! w â p a h t:c %>: i k â t ê %> w  
! 
!!€ wapâht4>ikâtê>w 
!!€ wapâhc>ikâtê>w


! ##VTAs
! ##VTA-1
! 
! #no changes, but some marked exceptions
! #w2 so mowêw and ayawêw don't contract (wîcêwêw can do both - code two stems?)
! 
! #ê-mowiht - VTA X>3SgO
! ê - %<: m o w2:w %>: i2:i h t 

! Immutable 'w', which does not require

!!€ ê-<mow2>i2ht
!!€ ê-<mow>iht
! 
! #ê-ayawikoyâhk
! ê - %<: a y a w2:w %>: i2:i k o y â h k 
! 
!!€ ê-<ayaw2>i2koyâhk
!!€ ê-<ayaw>ikoyâhk 
! 
! ##VTA-3(Cw) act like Cw nouns for all i2 and i suffixes (summarised below)
! #mark as normal w, w>o applies for i and i2
! #seem to need î2? for delayed 2>1 imp
! 
! #kikîskison - VTA 2Sg>1SgO
! k i t2:0 %<: k î s k i s w:o %>: i:0 n 
! 
!!€ kit2<kîskisw>in
!!€ ki0<kîskiso>0n
! 
! #nikîskisomâwa - VTA 1Sg>3'O
! n i t2:0 %<: k î s k i s w:o %>: i2:0 m â w a 
! 
!!€ nit2<kîskisw>i2mâwa
!!€ ni0<kîskiso>0mâwa
! 
! #ê-kîskisotân - VTA 1Sg>2SgO
! ê - %<: k î s k i s w:o %>: i2:0 t â n
! 
!!€ ê-<kîskisw>i2tân
!!€ ê-<kîskiso>0tân
! 
! #ê-kîskisot
! ê - %<: k î s k i s w:o %>: i:0 t 
! 
!!€ ê-<kîskisw>it 
!!€ ê-<kîskiso>0t
! 
! #ê-kîskisosk - VTA 3Sg>2SgO
! ê - %<: k î s k i s w:o %>: i2:0 s k 
! 
!!€ ê-<kîskisw>i2sk 
!!€ ê-<kîskiso>0sk
! 
! #ê-kîskisokoyâhk - VTA 3Sg>1PlO
! ê - %<: k î s k i s w:o %>: i2:0 k o y â h k
! 
!!€ ê-<kîskisw>i2koyâhk 
!!€ ê-<kîskiso>0koyâhk
!  
! #nikîskisokawin - VTA X>1SgO
! n i t2:0 %<: k î s k i s w:o %>: i2:0 k a w i n 
! 
!!€ nit2<kîskisw>i2kawin
!!€ ni0<kîskiso>0kawin
! 
! #kîskison - VTA imp 2Sg>1SgO
! k î s k i s w:o %>: i:0 n 
! 
!!€ kîskisw>in 
!!€ kîskiso>0n
! 
! #kîskisôhkan - VTA delayed 2Sg>1SgO
! k î s k i s w:ô %>: ii2:0 h k a n 
! 
!!€ kîskisw>ii2hkan
!!€ kîskisô>0hkan
